Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [181.174] QUALITY SERVICE WAGE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Covered airport or related location" means the Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport, Wold-Chamberlain Field, including all property owned by the Metropolitan Airports Commission at Minneapolis-St. Paul International Airport. new text end new text begin (c) "Covered airport or related location employer" or "employer" means: new text end new text begin (1) any person, corporation, limited liability company, or association employing any covered airport or related location worker in an occupation, industry, trade, business or service; or new text end new text begin (2) any person who contracts with a person to perform work related to the preparation or delivery of food for consumption on airplanes departing from a covered airport or related location. new text end new text begin Covered airport or related location employer does not include the United States government; the Metropolitan Airports Commission; or other state, county, or local political subdivision. new text end new text begin (d) "Covered airport or related location worker" means: new text end new text begin (1) any person employed to perform work at a covered airport or related location, provided at least half of the employee's time during any workweek is performed at a covered airport and related location; or new text end new text begin (2) any person who performs work related to the preparation or delivery of food for consumption on airplanes departing from a covered airport or related location. new text end new text begin Covered airport or related location worker does not include independent contractors or persons employed in an executive, administrative, or professional capacity. new text end new text begin (e) "Quality service wage" or "QSW" means the combined hourly wage rate and benefit rate designated by the Metropolitan Airports Commission to be the QSW. The QSW must be based on the determinations made by the General Services Administration pursuant to the federal McNamara-O'Hara Service Contract Act, United States Code, title 41, section 6701 to 6707, for the applicable localities and job classifications of employees. Effective July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, the quality service wage applicable to a covered airport must not be less than the following: new text end new text begin (1) any otherwise applicable minimum wage rate established by or through the Metropolitan Airports Commission (MAC), including through MAC contracts or licensing agreements; new text end new text begin (2) the amount of wages or supplements equal to the rate for health and welfare for all occupations, designated by the Metropolitan Airports Commission based on the determinations made by the federal Department of Labor pursuant to the McNamara-O'Hara Service Contract Act (SCA) requirements under United States Code, title 41, sections 6701 to 6707, for the geographic region in which the covered airport location is located and in effect on the date of the designation by the Metropolitan Airports Commission; and new text end new text begin (3) the local guard SCA wage determination, as applicable. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Quality service wage requirements. new text end new text begin Beginning July 1, 2026, each covered airport or related location employer must pay a covered airport or related location worker a wage of not less than the quality service wage applicable to that covered airport or related location worker. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Supplemental benefits rate. new text end new text begin The amount of wages or supplements equal to the rate for health and welfare benefits must be adjusted annually to the rate provided pursuant to the McNamara-O'Hara Service Contract Act (SCA) requirements under United States Code, title 41, sections 6701 to 6707. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Penalty. new text end new text begin (a) The Metropolitan Airports Commission may issue a penalty to the employer of not less than $1,000 and not more than $10,000 per violation of this section. new text end new text begin (b) In assessing the amount of the penalty under paragraph (a), the Metropolitan Airports Commission shall consider the size of the covered airport or related location, employer's business, the good faith of the covered airport or related location employer, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations, and the failure to comply with other requirements. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end